North Carolina statutes. Chapter 97. Workers’ Compensation Act.
Article 1. Workers’ Compensation Act.
§ 97-88.2.
Penalty for fraud.

Any person who willfully makes a false statement or representation of a material fact for the purpose of obtaining or denying any benefit or payment, or assisting another to obtain or deny any benefit or payment under this Article, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor if the amount at issue is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Violation of this section is a Class H felony if the amount at issue is one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more. The court may order restitution.

(a1)

When a person is convicted under subsection (a) of this section, the Commission may enter such orders as necessary to ensure that the person convicted does not benefit from the unlawful conduct.

The Commission shall:

Perform investigations regarding all cases of suspected fraud and all violations related to workers’ compensation claims, by or against insurers or self-funded employers, and refer possible criminal violations to the appropriate prosecutorial authorities;

Conduct administrative violation proceedings; and

Assess and collect civil penalties and restitution.The Commission may employ sworn law enforcement officers duly appointed and certified through the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission to conduct the investigations mandated by this subsection.

Any person who threatens an employee with criminal prosecution under the provisions of subsection (a) of this section for the purpose of coercing or attempting to coerce the employee into agreeing to compensation or agreeing to forgo compensation under this Article shall be guilty of a Class H felony.

The Commission shall not be liable in a civil action for any action made in good faith under this section, including the identification and referral of a person for investigation and prosecution for an alleged administrative violation or criminal offense. Any person, including, but not limited to, an attorney, an employee, an employer, an insurer, and an employee of an insurer, who in good faith comes forward with information under this section, shall not be liable in a civil action.

The Commission shall report annually to the General Assembly on the number and disposition of investigations involving claimants, employers, insurance company officials, officials of third-party administrators, insurance agents, attorneys, health care providers, and vocational rehabilitation providers.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 7.1; 1995, c. 507, s. 25(a); 1997-353, s. 1; 2005-448, s. 8; 2007-358, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-448, s. 8, effective October 1, 2005, added subsection (a1).

Session Laws 2007-358, s. 1, effective September 1, 2007, added the last paragraph of subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 487.

§ 97-88.3.
Penalty for health care providers.

In addition to any liability under

G.S. 97-88.2

, any health care provider who willfully or intentionally undertakes the following acts is subject to an administrative penalty, assessed by the Commission, not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000):

Submitting charges for health care that was not furnished;

Fraudulently administering, providing, and attempting to collect for inappropriate or unnecessary treatment or services; or

Violating the provisions of Article 28 of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.A penalty assessed by the Commission for a violation of subdivision (3) of this subsection is in addition to penalties assessed under G.S. 90-407.

In addition to any liability under

G.S. 97-88.2

, any health care provider who willfully or intentionally undertakes the following acts is subject to an administrative penalty, assessed by the Commission, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000):

Failing or refusing to timely file required reports or records;

Making unnecessary referrals; and

Knowingly violating this Article or rules promulgated hereunder, including treatment guidelines, with intention to deceive or to gain improper advantage of a patient, employee, insurer, or the Commission.

A health care provider who knowingly charges or otherwise holds an employee financially responsible for the cost of any services provided for a compensable injury under this Article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person, including, but not limited to, an employer, an insurer, and an employee of an insurer, who in good faith comes forward with information under this section, shall not be liable in a civil action.

Information relating to possible violations under this section shall be reported to the Commission which shall refer the same to the appropriate licensing or regulatory board or authority for the health care provider involved.

A hospital that relies in good faith on a written order of a physician in performing health care services shall not be subject to an administrative penalty in violation of this section.

History.

1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 7.2.

§ 97-89.
Commission may appoint qualified physician to make necessary examinations; expenses; fees.

The Commission or any member thereof may, upon the application of either party, or upon its own motion, appoint a disinterested and duly qualified physician or surgeon to make any necessary medical examination of the employee, and to testify in respect thereto. Said physician or surgeon shall be allowed traveling expenses and a reasonable fee to be fixed by the Commission. The fees and expenses of such physician or surgeon shall be paid by the employer.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 63; 1931, c. 274, s. 12; 1973, c. 520, s. 3.

§ 97-90.
Legal and medical fees to be approved by Commission; misdemeanor to receive fees unapproved by Commission, or to solicit employment in adjusting claims; agreement for fee or compensation.

Fees for attorneys and charges of health care providers for medical compensation under this Article shall be subject to the approval of the Commission; but no physician or hospital or other medical facilities shall be entitled to collect fees from an employer or insurance carrier until he has made the reports required by the Commission in connection with the case. Except as provided in G.S. 97-26(g), a request for a specific prior approval to charge shall be submitted to the Commission for each such fee or charge.

Any person (i) who receives any fee, other consideration, or any gratuity on account of services so rendered, unless such consideration or gratuity is approved by the Commission or the court, as provided in subsection (c), or (ii) who makes it a business to solicit employment for a lawyer or for himself in respect of any claim or award for compensation, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If an attorney has an agreement for fee or compensation under this Article, he shall file a copy or memorandum thereof with the hearing officer or Commission prior to the conclusion of the hearing. If the agreement is not considered unreasonable, the hearing officer or Commission shall approve it at the time of rendering decision. If the agreement is found to be unreasonable by the hearing officer or Commission, the reasons therefor shall be given and what is considered to be reasonable fee allowed. If within five days after receipt of notice of such fee allowance, the attorney shall file notice of appeal to the full Commission, the full Commission shall hear the matter and determine whether or not the attorney’s agreement as to a fee or the fee allowed is unreasonable. If the full Commission is of the opinion that such agreement or fee allowance is unreasonable and so finds, then the attorney may, by filing written notice of appeal within 10 days after receipt of such action by the full Commission, appeal to the senior resident judge of the superior court in the county in which the cause of action arose or in which the claimant resides; and upon such appeal said judge shall consider the matter and determine in his discretion the reasonableness of said agreement or fix the fee and direct an order to the Commission following his determination therein. The Commission shall, within 20 days after receipt of notice of appeal from its action concerning said agreement or allowance, transmit its findings and reasons as to its action concerning such agreement or allowance to the judge of the superior court designated in the notice of appeal. In all other cases where there is no agreement for fee or compensation, the attorney or claimant may, by filing written notice of appeal within five days after receipt of notice of action of the full Commission with respect to attorneys’ fees, appeal to the senior resident judge of the superior court of the district of the county in which the cause arose or in which the claimant resides; and upon such appeal said judge shall consider the matter of such fee and determine in his discretion the attorneys’ fees to be allowed in the cause. The Commission shall, within 20 days after notice of appeal has been filed, transmit its findings and reasons as to its action concerning such fee or compensation to the judge of the superior court designated in the notice of appeal; provided that the Commission shall in no event have any jurisdiction over any attorneys’ fees in any third-party action. In any case in which an attorney appeals to the superior court on the question of attorneys’ fees, the appealing attorney shall notify the Commission and the employee of any and all proceedings before the superior court on the appeal, and either or both may appear and be represented at such proceedings.The Commission, in determining an allowance of attorneys’ fees, shall examine the record to determine the services rendered. The factors which may be considered by the Commission in allowing a reasonable fee include, but are not limited to, the time invested, the amount involved, the results achieved, whether the fee is fixed or contingent, the customary fee for similar services, the experience and skill level of the attorney, and the nature of the attorney’s services.In making the allowance of attorneys’ fees, the Commission shall, upon its own motion or that of an interested party, set forth findings sufficient to support the amount approved.The Commission may deny or reduce an attorney’s fees upon proof of solicitation of employment in violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct of the North Carolina State Bar.

Provided, that nothing contained in this section shall prevent the collection of such reasonable fees of physicians and charges for hospitalization as may be recovered in an action, or embraced in settlement of a claim, against a third-party tort-feasor as described in

G.S. 97-10.2

.

A health care provider shall not pursue a private claim against an employee for all or part of the costs of medical treatment provided to the employee by the provider unless the employee’s claim or the treatment is finally adjudicated not to be compensable or the employee fails to request a hearing after denial of liability by the employer. Notwithstanding subsequent denial of liability or adjudication that the condition treated was not compensable, the insurer shall be liable as provided in

G.S. 97-26

to providers whose services have been authorized by the insurer or employer. The statute of limitations applicable to a provider’s claim for payment shall be tolled during the period the compensability of a claim or liability for particular treatment remains an issue in a compensation case.

If a dispute arises between an employee’s current and past attorney or attorneys regarding the division of a fee as approved by the Commission pursuant to this section, the Commission shall hear any dispute after the Commission has approved the settlement agreement. The Commission shall give notice to each of the employee’s current and past attorneys of record of the total amount of the approved fee prior to determining how the fee shall be divided between those attorneys. An attorney who is an interested party to an action under this subsection shall have the same rights of appeal as outlined in subsection (c) of this section.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 64; 1955, c. 1026, s. 4; 1959, cc. 1268, 1307; 1973, c. 520, s. 4; 1981, c. 521, s. 4; 1991, c. 703, s. 6; 1993, c. 539, s. 680; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 9.1; 2013-278, s. 1; 2017-124, s. 2.

Cross References.

For related subject in reference to fees of physicians and hospital charges, see

G.S. 97-26

.

As to attorneys’ fees as costs in certain appeals, see

G.S. 97-88

.

As to the assessment of attorneys’ fees incurred in hearings brought without reasonable ground, see

G.S. 97-88.1

.

§ 97-90.1.
Insurers that provide employee’s health benefit plans, disability income plans, or any other health insurance plans as real parties in interest; reimbursement.

An insurer that covers an employee under a health benefit plan as defined in

G.S. 58-3-167

, a disability income plan, or any other health insurance plan is not a real party in interest and shall not intervene or participate in any proceeding or settlement agreement under this Article to determine whether a claim is compensable under this Article or to seek reimbursement for medical payments under its plan. The insurer that covers an employee under a health benefit plan as defined in

G.S. 58-3-167

or any other health insurance plan may seek reimbursement from the employee, employer, or carrier that is liable or responsible for the specific medical charge according to a final adjudication of the claim under this Article or an order of the Commission approving a settlement agreement entered into under this Article for health plan payments for that specific medical charge. Upon the admission or adjudication that a claim is compensable, the party or parties liable shall notify in writing any known health benefit plan covering the employee of the admission or adjudication.

History.

2001-216, s. 1; 2001-487, s. 102(b).

§ 97-91.
Commission to determine all questions.

All questions arising under this Article if not settled by agreements of the parties interested therein, with the approval of the Commission, shall be determined by the Commission, except as otherwise herein provided.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 65.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Primary Issues in Compensation Litigation,” see 17 Campbell L. Rev. 443 (1995).

§ 97-92.
Employer’s record and report of accidents; records of Commission not open to public; supplementary report upon termination of disability; penalty for refusal to make report; when insurance carrier liable.

Every employer shall hereafter keep a record of all injuries, fatal or otherwise, received by his employees in the course of their employment on blanks approved by the Commission. Within five days after the occurrence and knowledge thereof as provided in

G.S. 97-22

of an injury to an employee, causing his absence from work for more than one day or charges for medical compensation exceeding the amount set by the Commission, a report thereof shall be made in writing and mailed or transmitted to the Commission in the form approved by the Commission for this purpose.

The records of the Commission that are not awards under

G.S. 97-84

and that are not reviews of awards under

G.S. 97-85

, insofar as they refer to accidents, injuries, and settlements are not public records under

G.S. 132-1

and shall not be open to the public, but only to the parties satisfying the Commission of their interest in such records and the right to inspect them, and to State and federal agencies pursuant to

G.S. 97-81

.

Upon the termination of the disability of the injured employee, or if the disability extends beyond a period of 60 days, then, also, at the expiration of such period the employer shall make a supplementary report to the Commission on blanks to be procured from the Commission for the purpose.

The said report shall contain the name, nature, and location of the business of the employer and name, age, sex, and wages and occupation of the injured employee, and shall state the date and hour of the accident causing injury, the nature and cause of the injury, and such other information as may be required by the Commission.

Any employer who refuses or neglects to make the report required by this section shall be liable for a penalty of not less than five dollars ($5.00) and not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each refusal or neglect. The fine herein provided may be assessed by the Commission in an open hearing, with the right of review and appeal as in other cases. In the event the employer has transmitted the report to the insurance carrier for transmission by such insurance carrier to the Industrial Commission, the insurance carrier willfully neglecting or failing to transmit the report shall be liable for the said penalty.

Any bill, report, application, and document of every nature and kind, which is required or permitted by Commission rules to be transmitted to the Commission by electronic media or is recorded among the Commission records on computer disk, optical disk, microfilm, or similar media and which is produced or reproduced in written form in the normal course of business or is certified as a true and accurate copy of the data recorded at the Commission in the normal course of its business shall be treated as a signed original in all uses before the Commission and as a duplicate within the meaning of Rule 1003 of the North Carolina Rules of Evidence.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 66; 1945, c. 766; 1991, c. 703, s. 9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 894, s. 3; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 10.8; 2001-216, s. 3; 2001-487, s. 102(b).

Cross References.

As to tabulation and publication of employers’ reports in annual report of Commission, see G.S. 97-81(b).

§ 97-93.
Employers required to carry insurance or prove financial ability to pay for benefits; employers required to post notice; self-insured employers regulated by Commissioner of Insurance.

Every employer subject to the provisions of this Article relative to the payment of compensation shall either:

Insure and keep insured his liability under this Article in any authorized corporation, association, organization, or in any mutual insurance association formed by a group of employers so authorized; or

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-362, s. 5.

Obtain a license from the Commissioner of Insurance under Article 5 of this Chapter or under Article 47 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes.

through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 1997-362, s. 5.

(e)

Every employer who is in compliance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall post in a conspicuous place in places of employment a notice stating that employment by this employer is subject to the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act and stating whether the employer has a policy of insurance against liability or qualifies as a self-insured employer. In the event the employer allows its insurance to lapse or ceases to qualify as a self-insured employer, the employer shall, within five working days of this occurrence, remove any notices indicating otherwise.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 67; 1943, c. 543; 1973, c. 1291, s. 12; 1979, c. 345; 1983, c. 728; 1985, c. 119, s. 1; 1993, c. 120, ss. 1, 2; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 8.2; 1995, c. 193, s. 64; c. 471, s. 1; 1997-362, s. 5.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on the provisions of this and other sections in relation to the law of contracts, see 13 N.C.L. Rev. 102 (1935).

§ 97-94.
Employers required to give proof that they have complied with preceding section; penalty for not keeping liability insured; review; liability for compensation; criminal penalties for failure to secure payment of compensation.

Every employer subject to the compensation provisions of this Article shall file with the Commission, in form prescribed by it, as often as the Commission determines to be necessary, evidence of its compliance with the provisions of

G.S. 97-93

and all other provisions relating thereto.

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-5, s. 22.1, effective July 1, 2018.

(b1)

Any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this Article who refuses or neglects to secure such compensation shall be punished by a penalty of one dollar ($1.00) for each employee, but not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100.00), for each day of such refusal or neglect and until the same ceases.

(b2)

As an alternative to the penalty imposed in subsection (b1) of this section, the employer may submit to the Commission evidence that the employer has obtained workers’ compensation insurance coverage from either an insurer licensed to do business in North Carolina or the North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Insurance Plan. In addition to submitting such evidence, the employer shall submit to the Commission all payroll records for the period or periods of noncompliance. The Commission shall, after verifying the coverage and upon the request of the employer, rescind the penalty assessed under subsection (b1) of this section and impose a penalty by:

First, determining the per employee cost of the current policy by dividing the cost of the policy by the number of employees covered by the policy.

Second, determining the average number of employees during the period of noncompliance.

Third, multiplying the per employee cost of the current policy by the average number of employees during the period of noncompliance and, to that total, by applying an additional penalty of ten percent (10%).The alternate penalty provided by this subsection is available only to an employer not previously penalized under this section.

Any penalty imposed by this section may be assessed by the Industrial Commission administratively, with the right to a hearing if requested within 30 days after notice of the assessment of the penalty and the right of review and appeal as in other cases. For the purposes of assessing the penalties set forth in subsections (b1) and (b2) of this section, the penalty shall not apply to a period of noncompliance that occurred more than three years prior to the date the Industrial Commission first assessed the penalty. Enforcement of the penalty shall be made by the Office of the Attorney General. The clear proceeds of penalties provided for in this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.In addition to any penalty under this section, the employer shall be liable, during the continuance of the refusal or neglect, to an employee for compensation under this Article or at law at the election of the injured employee. The Industrial Commission shall prioritize the payment of any compensation due an injured employee under this Article over the payment of any penalty owed pursuant to this section.Any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this Article who willfully fails to secure such compensation shall be guilty of a Class H felony. Any employer required to secure the payment of compensation under this Article who neglects to secure the payment of compensation shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

Any person who, with the ability and authority to bring an employer in compliance with

G.S. 97-93

, willfully fails to bring the employer in compliance, shall be guilty of a Class H felony. Any person who, with the ability and authority to bring an employer in compliance with

G.S. 97-93

, neglects to bring the employer in compliance, shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any person who violates this subsection may be assessed a civil penalty by the Commission in an amount up to one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of any compensation due the employer’s employees injured during the time the employer failed to comply with G.S. 97-93.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 97-101

, the Commission may suspend collection or remit all or part of any civil penalty imposed under this section on condition that the employer or person pays any compensation due and complies with

G.S. 97-93

.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 68; 1945, c. 766; 1963, c. 499; 1973, c. 1291, s. 13; 1985, c. 119, s. 4; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1027, s. 54; 1987, c. 729, s. 17; 1993, c. 539, s. 681; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 679, s. 8.1; 1997-353, s. 2; 1998-215, s. 115; 2018-5, s. 22.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 22.1, effective July 1, 2018, deleted subsection (b), relating to penalty for not keeping liability insured; added subsections (b1) and (b2); added the first two paragraphs in subsection (c); and, in subsection (e), substituted “any compensation” for “the compensation.”

Legal Periodicals.

For survey, “The North Carolina Workers’ Compensation Act of 1994: A Step in the Direction of Restoring Balance,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 2502 (1995).

For 1997 legislative survey, see 20 Campbell L. Rev. 487.

§ 97-95.
Actions against employers failing to effect insurance or qualify as self-insurer.

As to every employer subject to the provisions of this Article who shall fail or neglect to keep in effect a policy of insurance against compensation liability arising hereunder with some insurance carrier as provided in

G.S. 97-93

, or who shall fail to qualify as a self-insurer as provided in the Article, in addition to other penalties provided by this Article, such employer shall be liable in a civil action which may be instituted by the claimant for all such compensation as may be awarded by the Industrial Commission in a proceeding properly instituted before said Commission, and such action may be brought by the claimant in the county of his residence or in any county in which the defendant has any property in this State; and in said civil action, ancillary remedies provided by law in civil actions of attachment, receivership, and other appropriate ancillary remedies shall be available to plaintiff therein. Said action may be instituted before the award shall be made by the Industrial Commission in such case for the purpose of preventing the defendant from disposing of or removing from the State of North Carolina for the purpose of defeating the payment of compensation any property which the defendant may own in this State. In said action, after being instituted, the court may, after proper amendment to the pleadings therein, permit the recovery of a judgment against the defendant for the amount of compensation duly awarded by the North Carolina Industrial Commission and subject any property seized in said action for payment of the judgment so awarded. The institution of said action shall in no wise interfere with the jurisdiction of said Industrial Commission in hearing and determining the claim for compensation in full accord with the provisions of this Article. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit or abridge the rights of an employee as provided in subsection (b) of

G.S. 97-94

.

History.

1941, c. 352.

§ 97-96.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-362, s. 7.

§ 97-97.
Insurance policies must contain clause that notice to employer is notice to insurer, etc.

All policies insuring the payment of compensation under this Article must contain a clause to the effect that, as between the employer and the insurer the notice to or acknowledgment of the occurrence of the injury on the part of the insured employer shall be deemed notice or knowledge as the case may be, on the part of the insurer; that jurisdiction of the insured for the purposes of this Article shall be jurisdiction of the insurer, that the insurer shall in all things be bound by and subject to the awards, judgments, or decrees rendered against such insured employer, and that insolvency or bankruptcy of the employer and/or discharge therein shall not relieve the insurer from the payment of compensation for disability or death sustained by an employee during the life of such policy or contract.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 70.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina Construction Law Survey II,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 481 (1987).

§ 97-98.
Policy must contain agreement promptly to pay benefits; continuance of obligation of insurer in event of default.

No policy of insurance against liability arising under this Article shall be issued unless it contains the agreement of the insurer that it will promptly pay to the person entitled to same all benefits conferred by this Article, and all installments of the compensation that may be awarded or agreed upon, and that the obligation shall not be affected by any default of the insured after the injury or by any default in giving notice required by such policy or otherwise. Such agreement shall be construed to be a direct promise by the insurer to the person entitled to compensation enforceable in his name.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 71.

Cross References.

As to cancellation of policies, see note to

G.S. 97-93

.

As to The Stock Workers’ Compensation Security Fund, see G.S. 97-107.

§ 97-99.
Law written into each insurance policy; form of policy to be approved by Commissioner of Insurance; single catastrophe hazards.

Every policy for the insurance of the compensation in this Article, or against liability therefor, shall be deemed to be made subject to the provisions of this Article. No corporation, association or organization shall enter into any such policy of insurance unless its form has been approved by the Commissioner of Insurance.

This Article shall not apply to policies of insurance against loss from explosion of boilers or flywheels or other similar single catastrophe hazards: Provided, that nothing in this Article relieves an employer from liability for injury or death of an employee as a result of such an explosion or catastrophe.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 72; 1943, c. 170; 1945, c. 381, s. 1; 1959, c. 863, s. 5; 1967, c. 1218; 1993, c. 504, s. 31; 2001-241, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to prohibition against certain workers’ compensation insurance policy cancellations, see

G.S. 58-36-105

.

As to notice of nonrenewal, premium rate increase, or change in workers’ compensation insurance coverage, see

G.S. 58-36-110

.

§ 97-100.
Rates for insurance; carrier to make reports for determination of solvency; tax upon premium; wrongful or fraudulent representation of carrier punishable as misdemeanor; notices.

The rates charged by all carriers of insurance, including the parties to any mutual insurance association writing insurance against the liability for compensation under this Article, shall be fair, reasonable, and adequate.

Each insurance carrier shall report to the Commissioner of Insurance, in accordance with rules adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance, for the purpose of determining the solvency of the carrier and the adequacy of its rates; for this purpose the Commissioner of Insurance may inspect the books and records of any insurance carrier, and examine its agents, officers, and directors under oath.

Every insurer under this Article, every employer carrying its own risk under

G.S. 97-93

, and every group of employers that has pooled the employers’ liabilities under

G.S. 97-93

is subject to the premiums tax levied in Article 8B of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

through (f). Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 360, s. 1.

(g)

Any person who acts or assumes to act as agent for any insurance carrier whose authority to do business in this State has been suspended, while the suspension remains in force, who neglects or refuses to comply with any of the provisions of this section, or who willfully makes a false or fraudulent statement of the business or condition of any insurance carrier, is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.

(h)

Whenever by this Article, or the terms of any policy contract, any officer is required to give any notice to an insurance carrier, the notice may be given by delivery, or by mailing by registered letter properly addressed and stamped, to the principal office or general agent of the insurance carrier within this State, or to its home office, or to the secretary, general agent, or chief officer of the carrier in the United States, or to the Commissioner of Insurance.

(i)

through (k). Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 360, s. 1.

History.

1929, c. 120, s. 73; 1931, c. 274, s. 13; 1947, c. 574; 1961, c. 833, s. 13; 1977, c. 828, s. 7; 1985, c. 119, s. 2; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 928, s. 13; 1989, c. 647, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 682; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 360, s. 1(h).

Cross References.

As to the North Carolina Rate Bureau, see

G.S. 58-36-1

et seq.

As to the regulation of insurance rates, see

G.S. 58-40-1

et seq.

§ 97-101.
Collection of fines and penalties.

The Industrial Commission shall have the power by civil action brought in its own name to enforce the collection of any fines or penalties provided by this Article.

History.

1931, c. 274, s. 14; 2015-264, s. 52.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-264, s. 52, effective October 1, 2015, deleted “, and fines or penalties collected by the Commission shall become a part of the maintenance fund referred to in subsection (j) of

G.S. 97-100

” following “by this Article”.

§ 97-101.1.
Commission may issue writs of habeas corpus.

The Industrial Commission may issue a writ of habeas corpus ad testificandum under Article 8 of Chapter 17 of the General Statutes although it is not a court of record.

History.

1998-217, s. 31.1(a).